Utah statutes.
53B-1-101.5.   Definitions.

As used in this title:

(1)  "Board" means the State Board of Regents established in Section 53B-1-103.

(2)  "Career and technical education" means organized educational programs offering sequences of courses or skill sets directly related to preparing individuals for paid or unpaid employment in current or emerging occupations that generally do not require a baccalaureate or advanced degree.

(3)  "Commissioner" means the commissioner of higher education appointed in accordance with Section 53B-1-105.



Amended by Chapter 346, 2009 General Session

